Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-673
Short-time compensation program; terms,
defined.

For
purposes of sections 48-672 to 48-683:

(1) Affected unit
means a specified plant, department, shift, or other definable unit which
includes three or more employees to which an approved short-time compensation
plan applies;

(2) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor or any delegate
or subordinate responsible for approving applications for participation in
a short-time compensation plan;

(3) Health and retirement benefits means
employer-provided health benefits and retirement benefits under a defined
benefit plan, as defined in section 414(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, or
contributions under a defined contribution plan, as defined in section 414(i)
of the Internal Revenue Code, which are incidents of employment in addition
to the cash remuneration earned;

(4) Short-time compensation means the unemployment
benefits payable to employees in an affected unit under an approved short-time
compensation plan, as distinguished from the unemployment benefits otherwise
payable under the Employment Security Law;

(5) Short-time compensation plan means a
plan submitted by an employer, for written approval by the commissioner, under
which the employer requests the payment of short-time compensation to workers
in an affected unit of the employer to avert layoffs;

(6) Unemployment
compensation means the unemployment benefits payable under the Employment
Security Law other than short-time compensation and includes any amounts payable
pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation,
assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment; and

(7) Usual weekly
hours of work means the usual hours of work for full-time or part-time employees
in the affected unit when that unit is operating on its regular basis, not
to exceed forty hours and not including hours of overtime work.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 14.